District of Columbia statutes.
38-822.04

Central kitchen.

(a)

The District of Columbia Public Schools shall establish a central facility in the District to:

(1)

Prepare, process, grow, and store healthy and nutritious foods for schools and nonprofit organizations;

(2)

Support nutrition education programs; and

(3)

Provide job-training programs for students and District residents.

(b)

The District of Columbia Public Schools shall provide reasonable access to charter schools that wish to use the facility.

(c)

The Department of General Services shall assist the District of Columbia Public Schools in selecting real property for the facility and the Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization shall convert the real property into the facility.

(d)

On or before December 31 of each year until the project is completed, the District of Columbia Public Schools, in consultation with the Department of General Services, shall issue a report to the Mayor, the Council, and the Healthy Schools and Youth Commission documenting progress on the development of the central kitchen.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 204, 57 DCR 4779
Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-37, § 2(f), 58 DCR 6841
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4062(d), 59 DCR 8025
D.C. Law 19-37 added subsec. (d).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Department of Real Estate Services” in (c).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-143, August 9, 2011, 58 DCR 6814).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(d) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(d) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
Section 4063 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 4062 of the act shall apply as of June 20, 2012.